Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.32, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Student health and census datadeleted text begin ; data on parentsdeleted text end . (a) Health data concerning students, including but not limited to, data concerning immunizations, notations of special physical or mental problems and records of school nurses are educational data. Access by parents to student health data shall be pursuant to section 13.02, subdivision 8. (b) Pupil census data, including emergency information and family information are educational data. deleted text begin (c) Data concerning parents are private data on individuals but may be treated as directory information if the same procedures that are used by a school district to designate student data as directory information under subdivision 5 are followed. deleted text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.32, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Directory informationnew text begin ; data on parentsnew text end . (a) Educational data designated as directory information is public data on individuals to the extent required under federal law. Directory information must be designated pursuant to the provisions of: (1) this subdivision; and (2) United States Code, title 20, section 1232g, and Code of Federal Regulations, title 34, section 99.37, which were in effect on January 3, 2012. (b) When conducting the directory information designation and notice process required by federal law, an educational agency or institution shall give parents and students notice of the right to refuse to let the agency or institution designate specified data about the student as directory information. This notice may be given by any means reasonably likely to inform the parents and students of the right. (c) An educational agency or institution may not designate a student's new text begin or parent's new text end home address, telephone number, email address, or other personal contact information as directory information under this subdivision. This paragraph does not apply to a postsecondary institution. (d) When requested, educational agencies or institutions must share personal student new text begin or parent new text end contact information and directory information, whether public or private, with the Minnesota Department of Education, as required for federal reporting purposes. (e) When requested, educational agencies or institutions may share personal student new text begin or parent new text end contact information and directory information for students served in special education with postsecondary transition planning and services under section 125A.08, paragraph (b), clause (1), whether public or private, with the Department of Employment and Economic Development, as required for coordination of services to students with disabilities under sections 125A.08, paragraph (b), clause (1); 125A.023; and 125A.027. new text begin (f) Data concerning parents is private data on individuals but may be treated as directory information if the same procedures that are used by a school district to designate student data as directory information under this subdivision are followed, except that a parent's home address, telephone number, email address, or other personal contact information may not be treated as directory information under this subdivision. new text end new text begin (g) For the purpose of voter outreach in a school district referendum, during the period between 90 days before the date of the election until the date of the election for which voters are contacted, an educational agency or institution must, upon request by a committee, as defined in section 211A.01, subdivision 4a, unless prohibited by a school district policy applicable to all committees, provide the committee with a parent's address, telephone number, and email address. A committee may not use or disseminate data collected under this paragraph for any purpose other than voter outreach in the school district referendum and must destroy data collected under this paragraph within 15 days following the date of the election for which the data was collected. A committee is subject to the penalties and remedies under sections 13.08, 13.085, and 13.09 for a violation of this paragraph. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Sections 1 and 2 are effective the day following final enactment. Beginning upon the effective date of sections 1 and 2, a parent's personal contact information subject to those sections must be treated by an educational agency or institution as private data on individuals regardless of whether that contact information was previously designated as or treated as directory information under Minnesota Statutes, section 13.32, subdivision 2. new text end